Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.248

Cease and desist orders.

If it appears to the director that a person has engaged or is about to engage in an act or practice constituting a violation of a provision of this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter, the director may, in the director's discretion, issue an order directing the person to cease and desist from continuing the act or practice. Reasonable notice of and opportunity for a hearing shall be given. The director may issue a temporary order pending the hearing, which shall remain in effect until ten days after the hearing is held and which shall become final if the person to whom notice is addressed does not request a hearing within twenty calendar days after the receipt of the notice.

[ 2012 c 121 s 10; 1979 ex.s. c 13 s 4.]